Illinois, session 104th, SB4157.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $2,116,144,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the State Universities Retirement System for the 8State's contribution, as provided by law. 9    Section 10. The sum of $250,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Pensions Fund 11to the State Universities Retirement System pursuant to the 12provisions of Section 8.12 of the State Finance Act. 13    Section 15. The sum of $11,707,648, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 15Assistance Fund to the State Universities Retirement System 16for deposit into the Community College Health Insurance 17Security Fund for the State's contributions, as required by 18law. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202026.